Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 8. General Provisions.

Sec. 37.05.900.
Interpretation of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed as supplemental to all other state laws not in conflict with it.
If a section or part of a section of this chapter is in conflict with federal requirements for a program for which federal grant-in-aid funds are available, the section or part to the extent of the conflict is inoperative.

History.

(§ 1 art VIII ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 18 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.300

. Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 37.05.910.
Applicability to University of Alaska.

The commissioner of administration may delegate the performance of the functions under this chapter as they relate to the university to the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska and set out the criteria and guidelines which shall be followed.
The commissioner shall direct necessary stipulations and exercise monitoring responsibility for conformance through the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 5 ch 46 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.305

. Renumbered in 1988.

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent on ch. 46, SLA 1977 (HCSSB 261), see 1977 House Journal, p. 1019.

Sec. 37.05.920.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of the state begins on July 1 of each year and ends at midnight on the following June 30.
The accounts of the Department of Administration, the Department of Revenue, and all other state officers whose accounts are in any way connected with the treasury shall be kept, and all duties performed with reference to the beginning and ending of the fiscal year.

History.

(§ 12-4-1 ACLA 1949; am § 2 art VI ch 82 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 12-4-1 ACLA 1949 was repealed and re-enacted by § 30, ch. 133, SLA 1951. Section 1, ch. 24, SLA 1953 repealed ch. 133, SLA 1951 and § 2, ch. 24, SLA 1953 re-enacted § 12-4-1 ACLA 1949 as it appeared in ACLA 1949.

Formerly AS

37.05.310

. Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 37.05.990.
Definitions for chapter.

In this chapter,

“fiscal year,” “budget year,” “accounting year,” or similar term means a year beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year;

“state agency,” “agency,” “department,” or similar term means a department, office, institution, board, commission, bureau, division, or other administrative unit forming the state government, and includes the Alaska Pioneers’ Home, the Alaska Veterans’ Home, and the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 3 art I ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 46 SLA 1977; am § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.320

. Renumbered as AS

37.05.400

in 1983. Renumbered again in 1988. Also reorganized in 1988 to delete repealed definitions.

Sec. 37.05.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Fiscal Procedures Act.

History.

(§ 1 art I ch 82 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.330

. Renumbered as AS

37.05.410

in 1983. Renumbered again in 1988.